Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-506
Museums; board; finances; care of building.

The museum board shall have exclusive control of expenditures, of all money collected or donated to the credit of the museum fund, of the renting or construction of a museum building and the supervision, care, and custody of the grounds, rooms, or buildings constructed, leased, or set apart for that purpose.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 6, p. 769.

Because the vote establishing museum hereunder limited the tax levy to the maintenance of a museum constructed by public-donated funds, it was held that tax funds cannot be used for construction purposes. Geer-Melkus Constr. Co., Inc. v. Hall County Museum Board, 186 Neb. 615, 185 N.W.2d 671 (1971).